en: Frozen celery stalks
fr: Céleri-branche surgelé

en: Celeriac
fr: Céleri-rave
hr: Celer korjenaš
nl: Koolrapen, Koolraap
pl: Seler korzeniowy

en: Cooked celeriac
fr: Céleri-rave cuit
hr: Kuhani celer
nl: Gekookte koolrapen, Gekookte koolraap

en: Chards, Chard, Swiss chard
ar: سلق
bg: Манголд
bs: Blitva
ca: bleda
co: Geia
cs: Mangold
de: Mangold
el: Σέσκουλο
eo: Folibeto
es: Acelgas, Acelga
eu: Zerba
fa: برگ چغندر
fi: Lehtimangoldi
fr: Blettes, Blette
ga: Biatas bán
gl: Acelga
he: סלק עלים
hr: blitve, blitva
hu: Mángold
it: Bietola
ja: フダンソウ
kk: Жапырақты қызылша
ko: 근대
ku: Dîw
la: Beta vulgaris var. cicla
mk: Блитва
nb: bladbete
nl: snijbiet
nn: mangold
pl: Botwina, Boćwina, Burak liściowy
pt: acelga
ro: Mangold
ru: мангольд
sr: блитва
sv: Mangold
tr: Pazı
uk: Мангольд
zh: 莙薘菜

en: Fresh chards
es: Acelgas frescas
fr: Blettes fraîches
hr: Svježe blitve

en: Cooked Swiss chard
fr: Bette cuite, Blette cuite

en: Cucumbers
bg: Краставици
de: Gurken
es: Pepinos
fi: kurkut
fr: Concombres
hr: krastavci
hu: Uborka
ja: キュウリ, きゅうり, 胡瓜
la: Cucumis sativus
nl: Komkommers
pl: Ogórki
ru: Огурцы, Огурец
tr: Salatalık, Hıyar

en: Fresh cucumbers
de: Frische Gurken
es: Pepinos frescos
fr: Concombre frais
hr: Svježi krastavci
pl: Ogórki świeże

en: Small cucumbers, Gherkins (non-pickled)
sv: Smågurkor

en: Endives, Endive, Escaroles
ca: endívia
cy: Endif
de: Endivien, Endivie
eo: Endivio
es: Escarolas
eu: Osterzuri
fa: اندیو
fi: Endiivi
fr: scarole, Chicorée endive
ga: Searbhán muc
gl: endivia
he: עולש
hr: endivije, endivija
hu: Endívia
id: Endive
io: Endivio
it: Scarola, indivia
ja: エンダイブ
ko: 꽃상추
ku: Xêzimok
la: Cichorium endivia
nb: endivie
nl: Andijvie
nv: Tʼąąʼdoolghasí
pl: Endywia eskarola
pt: Endívia
ro: Andivă
ru: эндивий
sr: Ендивија
sv: Sydcikoria
tr: Hindiba
uk: цикорій салатний
vi: Rau cúc đắng
zh: 苦苣

en: Belgian endives, Witloof, Chicory
de: Chicorée Salat
es: Endibias, Endivias
fr: Endives, Chicon
hr: Belgijska endivija
la: Cichorium intybus var. foliosum
nl: Witlof
pl: Cykoria

en: Canned Belgian endives
fr: Endives en conserve
nl: Witlof in blik

en: Fresh Belgian endives
fr: Endives fraîches
nl: Verse witlof

en: Curly endives
fr: Chicorée frisée
hr: Kovrčave endivije
pl: Endywia kędzierzawa

en: Red endives
fr: Chicorée rouge

en: Green endive
fr: Chicorée verte

en: Fennel
af: Vinkel
ar: شمرة شائعة
az: Adi razyana
ba: Фенхель үләне
be: фенхель звычайны
bg: Резене
br: Lost-louarn
bs: Komorač
ca: fonoll
ce: Йиппар
cs: fenykl
cy: Ffenigl
da: Fennikel
de: Fenchel
dv: ދަވިއްގަނދު
el: Μάραθο
eo: fenkolo
es: hinojo
et: Apteegitill
eu: Mihilu
fa: رازیانه
fi: Fenkoli
fr: Fenouils, Fenouil, Fenouil commun
ga: Finéal
gl: Fiúncho
gu: વરિયાળી
he: שומר פשוט
hi: सौंफ
hr: Komorač
ht: Anis
hu: Édeskömény
id: Adas
io: Fenikulo
is: Fennikka
it: finocchio
ja: フェンネル
jv: Adas
ka: დიდი კამა
kk: Волош аскөгі
kn: ಸೊಂಪು
ko: 회향
ku: Rizyane
la: Foeniculum vulgare
lt: Paprastasis pankolis
lv: fenhelis
mk: морач
ml: പെരുംജീരകം
mr: बडीशेप
ms: Pokok Adas
my: စမုန်စပါး
nb: fennikel
ne: सुप
nl: venkel
nn: Fennikel
or: ପାନମଧୁରୀ
pa: ਮੇਥੀ
pl: Fenkuł włoski
pt: Funcho
qu: Inuhu
ro: Fenicul
sc: Fenugu
sd: وڏڦ
sh: Komorač
si: මාදුරු
sk: Fenikel
sl: Komarček
sq: Maraja
sr: Коморач
su: Adas
sv: Fänkål
ta: பெருஞ்சீரகம்
te: సోంపు
th: ผักชีล้อม
tl: Haras
tr: Rezene
uk: фенхель
ur: سونف
zh: 茴香

en: Fennel bulbs
de: Fenchelknollen
es: Bulbos de hinojo
fr: Bulbes de fenouil
hr: Lukovice komorača
nl: Venkelknollen

en: Boiled fennel, Fennel cooked in water
fr: Fenouil bouilli, Fenouil cuit à l'eau

en: Fresh fennel bulbs, Fresh fennel
fr: Bulbes de fenouil frais, Fenouil frais
nl: Verse venkelknollen